apertium-mrj-fin.mrj.lexc
LEXICON acr4
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr5 ;
acrotag ;

LEXICON acr5
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acrotag ;
acrotag ;

LEXICON acrotag
%<n%>%<acr%>: ACRONDELIMITER ;

LEXICON acros
см³ acrotag ;
°C acrotag ;
K acrotag ; ! Kelvin, Latin letter K


LEXICON conjunctions

ато:ато CONJ_   ; !"muuten; muutoin"
вет:вет PCLE_   ; !"-han"
вуйта:вуйта CONJ_   ; !"kuin; ikään kuin; aivan kuin; mukamas"
гӹнь:гӹнь CONJ_   ; !"jos; mikäli; ellei; jollei"
гӹньӹ:гӹньӹ CONJ_   ; !"jos; mikäli; ellei; jollei"
гӹнят:гӹнят CONJ_   ; !"vaikka; vaikkakin; vaikkei; silti"
дон:дон Cc   ; !"ja"
дык:дык CONJ_   ; !"jos"
дӓ:дӓ Cc   ; !"ja"
зато:зато CONJ_   ; !"sen sijaan"
ито:ито PCLE_   ; !"jopa"
керек:керек CONJ_   ; !"vaikka; joskin"
льывы:льывы CONJ_   ; !"tai"
манын:манын CONJ_   ; !"että"
ни:ни CONJ_   ; !""
но:но CONJ_   ; !"mutta"
потомушто:потомушто CONJ_   ; !"koska"
седӹндон:седӹндон CONJ_   ; !"siksi"
седӹндоно:седӹндоно CONJ_   ; !"siksi"
только:только CONJ_   ; !"mutta"
тоты:тоты CONJ_   ; !"muuten"
тӓ:тӓ CONJ_   ; !""
тӹндон:тӹндон CONJ_   ; !"siksi"
хоть:хоть CONJ_   ; !"vaikka"
хоть:хоть Cs   ; !""
ылгецӹ:ылгецӹ CONJ_   ; !"jospa"
ӓли:ӓли CONJ_   ; !"tai"
ӓль:ӓль CONJ_   ; !"tai"
а:а CONJ_   ; !"mutta"

LEXICON Exceptions

! Short form
ӹшке%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg3%>%<dat%>:ӹш%>лӓнжӹ K ;

LEXICON interjections

а:а INTERJ_   ; !""
ага:ага INTERJ_   ; !""
ай:ай INTERJ_   ; !""
алло:алло INTERJ_   ; !""
альок:альок INTERJ_   ; !""
атат:атат INTERJ_   ; !""
батюшки:батюшки INTERJ_   ; !""
йывылдик:йывылдик INTERJ_   ; !""
караул:караул INTERJ_   ; !""
кӹш:кӹш INTERJ_   ; !""
макар:макар INTERJ_   ; !""
мотри:мотри INTERJ_   ; !""
мотрӓй:мотрӓй INTERJ_   ; !""
нӓ:нӓ INTERJ_   ; !""
нӓмӓ:нӓмӓ INTERJ_   ; !""
нӓӓй:нӓӓй INTERJ_   ; !""
пыйца:пыйца INTERJ_   ; !""
пытьыри:пытьыри INTERJ_   ; !""
пӧчӧк:пӧчӧк INTERJ_   ; !""
роккаляге:роккаляге INTERJ_   ; !""
сӧ:сӧ INTERJ_   ; !""
сӧвичӹ:сӧвичӹ INTERJ_   ; !""
сӧгуды:сӧгуды INTERJ_   ; !""
сӧдӱгӹ:сӧдӱгӹ INTERJ_   ; !""
сӱнзӹ:сӱнзӹ INTERJ_   ; !""
тига:тига INTERJ_   ; !""
тырлай:тырлай INTERJ_   ; !""
тырлай-итӓй:тырлай-итӓй INTERJ_   ; !""
чук-чук:чук-чук INTERJ_   ; !""
чур:чур INTERJ_   ; !""
ша:ша INTERJ_   ; !""
шабаш:шабаш INTERJ_   ; !""
шатын:шатын INTERJ_   ; !""
шеремет:шеремет INTERJ_   ; !""
шӹл:шӹл INTERJ_   ; !""
эр-эр:эр-эр INTERJ_   ; !""
ӓлдӓ:ӓлдӓ INTERJ_   ; !""
ӓлдӓдӓ:ӓлдӓдӓ INTERJ_   ; !""
ӹш-ш:ӹш-ш INTERJ_   ; !""

LEXICON propernouns

Аапо:Аапо PROP_   ; !""
Европа:Европа PROP_   ; !""
Ильин:Ильин PROP_   ; !""
Йыл:Йыл PROP_   ; !""
Йылымбал:Йылымбал PROP_   ; !""
Йынгы:Йынгы PROP_   ; !""
Йӱрйӹ:Йӱрйӹ PROP_   ; !""
Казански:Казански PROP_   ; !""
Курйы:Курйы PROP_   ; !""
Микольны:Микольны PROP_   ; !""
Москва:Москва PROP_   ; !""
Пӹсӹрмӓн:Пӹсӹрмӓн PROP_   ; !""
Россий:Россий PROP_   ; !""
Санзара:Санзара PROP_   ; !""
Семӹк:Семӹк PROP_   ; !""
Сибирь:Сибирь PROP_   ; !""
Тимо:Тимо PROP_   ; !""
Цaрлaныш:Цaрлaныш PROP_   ; !""
Цикмӓ:Цикмӓ PROP_   ; !""
Цӓрлӓ:Цӓрлӓ PROP_   ; !""
Шавашӓнгӹр:Шавашӓнгӹр PROP_   ; !""
Шартял:Шартял PROP_   ; !""
Юхани:Юхани PROP_   ; !""
! ================= !
! Punctuation marks !
! ================= !


LEXICON Punctuation


! Clause boundary symbols

%,%<clb%>:%,           # ;
%.%<clb%>:%.           # ;
%.%.%<clb%>:%.%.       # ;
%.%.%.%<clb%>:%.%.%.   # ;
%:%<clb%>:%:           # ;
%;%<clb%>:%;	        # ;
!%<clb%>:%!	    # ;	!^C^
%?%<clb%>:%?	        # ;
…%<clb%>:…		        # ;
¿%<clb%>:¿		        # ;	! Only seen as noise.
¶%<clb%>:¶		        # ;	

•%<punct%>:•	        # ;
-%<punct%>:-           # ; !hyphen
--%<punct%>:--         # ; !double hyphen
–%<punct%>:–           # ; !endash
—%<punct%>:—           # ; !emdash
=%<punct%>:=           # ;
&%<punct%>:&           # ;
%<%>%<punct%>:%<%>           # ;
`%<punct%>:`           # ;
´%<punct%>:´           # ;
'%<punct%>:'           # ;

!%%%<punct%>:%%         # ; ! This one causes problems in HFST
!%"%<punct%>:%"         # ;
!%*%<punct%>:%*         # ;
!/%<punct%>:/           # ; 
!%<_-%>%<punct%>:%<_-%>       # ;
!%~%<punct%>:%~	        # ;

! Paired punctuation marks

%«%<punct%>%<left%>:%«    # ;
%»%<punct%>%<right%>:%»   # ;
%“%<punct%>%<left%>:%“    # ;
%”%<punct%>%<right%>:%”   # ;
%‘%<punct%>%<left%>:%‘    # ;
%’%<punct%>%<right%>:%’   # ;
%‹%<punct%>%<left%>:%‹    # ;
%›%<punct%>%<right%>:%›   # ;
%(%<punct%>%<left%>:%(    # ;
%)%<punct%>%<right%>:%)   # ;
%[%<punct%>%<left%>:%[    # ;
%]%<punct%>%<right%>:%]   # ;
%{%<punct%>%<left%>:%{    # ;
%}%<punct%>%<right%>:%}   # ;
%<%<punct%>%<left%>:%<    # ;
%>%<punct%>%<left%>:%>    # ;

LEXICON A_  !!= * @CODE@ 
%<a%>: # ;
%<a%>%<comp%>:%>рак # ;
%<a%>%<der_n%>: N_ОЛМА ; !! This should be neutral 2013-05-11

LEXICON A_ОЛМА !!= * @CODE@
%<a%>: # ;
%<a%>%<comp%>:%>рак # ;
%<a%>%<der_n%>: N_ОЛМА ;

LEXICON A_ТӸРВӸ  !!= * @CODE@
%<a%>: # ;
%<a%>%<comp%>:%>рак # ;
%<a%>%<der_n%>: N_ТӸРВӸ ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:


!! !!!Compounding
!! Does Hill Mari have anything like LEXICON R and %- N ;


! ============ !
!! !!Interj lexica 
! ============ !

LEXICON INTERJ_  !!= * @CODE@ 
%<interj%>: K ;


! ============ !
!! !!Postp lexica 
! ============ !


! This contlex allows for relational word which, otherwise, are open 
! to extensive declension

LEXICON POSTP_  !!= * @CODE@ 
%<po%>: K ;
%<po%>%<pxsg1%>:%>Е2м K ;
%<po%>%<pxsg2%>:%>Е2т K ;
%<po%>%<pxsg3%>:%>Ы1жЫ1 K ;
%<po%>%<pxpl1%>:%>нА1 K ;
%<po%>%<pxpl2%>:%>дА1 K ;
%<po%>%<pxpl3%>:%>Ы1штЫ1 K ;

LEXICON Ad-A_ !!= * @CODE@ 
%<ada%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV_ ! 
%<adv%>: K ;
%<adv%>%<comp%>:%>рак # ;

LEXICON ADV_КОЛ ! 
 ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV_ОЛМА ! 
 ADV_ ;

LEXICON DESCR_
%<adv%>%<descr%>: K ;

LEXICON SPAT_
%<spat%>: K ;


!!Temporal tags with cases

LEXICON TEMP_  !!= * @CODE@ 
%<adv%>%<temp%>: K ;




LEXICON Cc
%<cc%>: # ;

LEXICON Cs
%<cs%>: # ;

LEXICON CONJ_
%<conj%>: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Compar-Stnd
%<pcle%>%<compar%>: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Epist
%<pcle%>%<epist%>: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Neg-Contrast
%<pcle%>%<neg%>%<intensive%>: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Neg
%<pcle%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Qst
%<pcle%>%<qst%>: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Superl
%<pcle%>%<superl%>: # ;

LEXICON PCLE_
%<pcle%>: # ;


LEXICON N-Voc-Px1Sg
%<n%>%<px1sg%>%<interj%>%<voc%>: # ;

!LEXICON EndNeg 
!%<cc%>%<neg%>: # ; ! ни

!LEXICON EndQST
!%<qst%>: # ;

!LEXICON ONOM-End
!%<onom%>: # ;

!LEXICON DESCR-End
!%<descr%>: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! !!!Clitics
!! ----

!! Hill Mari (Western Mari) adverbial clitics are not bound by POS.

LEXICON K
            # ;
%<foc_ат%>:%>А1т # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! !!!Noun inflection
!! ----

!! Hill Mari nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON NTag  !!= * @CODE@ 
%<n%>: NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE ;
%<n%>: NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: 	  K	; 

!! !!Substandard

LEXICON N_КОЛ_SUB !!= * @CODE@ 
%<use_sub%>: N_КОЛ ;

LEXICON N_ТӸРВӸ_SUB !!= * @CODE@ 
%<use_sub%>: N_ТӸРВӸ ;

!! !!Standard

LEXICON N_КОЛ !!= @CODE@ кол:кол
%<n%>: NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE ;
%<n%>: NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: 	  K	; 

LEXICON N_ТӸРВӸ !!= * @CODE@ тӹрвӹ:тӹрвӹ
!! The stem vowel "е" is found with possessor indices and the lative
%<n%>: NMN_OBLIQUE-INDEFINITE ;
%<n%>: NMN_OBLIQUE-POSSESSA ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: 	  K	; 
%<n%>%<sg%>%<lat%>:%>Е2ш 	  K	; 
!%<n%>%<pxsg1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:%>Е2м K ;
!%<n%>%<pxsg1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>Е2мвлӓ K ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<pxsg1%>:влӓэм K ;
!%<n%>%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:%>Е2т K ;
!%<n%>%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:Е2твлӓ K ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<pxsg2%>:влӓэт K ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<lat%>%<pxsg1%>:%>Е2шем	   K  ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<lat%>%<pxsg3%>:%>Е2шЫ1жЫ1	   K  ;
!%<n%>%<pxsg1%>:%>Е2м SG-ABEACCCOMDATGEN ;
%<n%>%<pxsg1%>:эм PL-ABEACCCOMDATGENILLINELATNOM ;
 
LEXICON SG-ABEACCCOMDATGEN
%<sg%>%<abe%>:де K ;
%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>Ы1м K ;
%<sg%>%<com%>:ге K ;
%<sg%>%<comp%>:%>лА1 K ;
%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>лА1н K ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>Ы1н K ;

LEXICON adjectives
броньдымы:броньдымы A_   ; !""
госпитальыштышы:госпитальыштышы A_   ; !""
изданиӓн:изданиӓн A_   ; !""
йолтишкӓ:йолтишкӓ A_ОЛМА   ; !"huoleton"
йонгыды:йонгыды A_ТӸРВӸ   ; !"avara; väljä; tilava"
кагыльдымы:кагыльдымы A_   ; !""
кедӓн:кедӓн A_   ; !""
концернӹштӹшӹ:концернӹштӹшӹ A_   ; !""
кыльгата:кыльгата A_   ; !""
кӹшкӓрӓн:кӹшкӓрӓн A_   ; !""
малык:малык A_   ; !""
наставлениӓн:наставлениӓн A_   ; !""
платян:платян A_   ; !""
резолюциӓн:резолюциӓн A_   ; !""
теллыкаш:теллыкаш A_   ; !""
цараан:цараан A_   ; !""
электричестван:электричестван A_   ; !""
LEXICON adverbs
вырге:вырге ADV_   ; !""
иктӓ-мазар:иктӓ-мазар ADV_   ; !""
йыдпелвец:йыдпелвец ADV_   ; !""
ковыжге:ковыжге ADV_   ; !""
кытын-тореш:кытын-тореш ADV_   ; !""
кӹрӹлтӹштеок:кӹрӹлтӹштеок ADV_   ; !""
малан-гӹнят:малан-гӹнят ADV_   ; !""
ньӹмешкӹ:ньӹмешкӹ ADV_   ; !""
потикӓ:потикӓ ADV_   ; !""
слабкан:слабкан ADV_   ; !""
тангылан:тангылан ADV_   ; !""
тупке:тупке ADV_   ; !""
цувырге:цувырге ADV_   ; !""
ӓмге-молге:ӓмге-молге ADV_   ; !""
LEXICON descriptives
вӹчӹ-вӹчӹ:вӹчӹ-вӹчӹ DESCR_   ; !""
йыгылт-йогылт:йыгылт-йогылт DESCR_   ; !""
кож-гож:кож-гож DESCR_   ; !""
кыйыр-гыйыр:кыйыр-гыйыр DESCR_   ; !""
кычырик:кычырик DESCR_   ; !""
лычы-лычы:лычы-лычы DESCR_   ; !""
мяук:мяук DESCR_   ; !""
ньыз-ньыз:ньыз-ньыз DESCR_   ; !""
пыль-воль:пыль-воль DESCR_   ; !""
рия-рия:рия-рия DESCR_   ; !""
тӱп:тӱп DESCR_   ; !""
цыжик-цожик:цыжик-цожик DESCR_   ; !""
чок-чок:чок-чок DESCR_   ; !""
шыгылдик:шыгылдик DESCR_   ; !""
LEXICON nouns
ажак% вӓтӹ:ажак-вӓт N_ТӸРВӸ_SUB   ; !"leskeksi jäänyt nainen"
андак:андак ADV_КОЛ   ; !"ajoissa"
антропологи:антропологи NTag   ; !"antropologi"
благословени:благословени NTag   ; !"siunaus"
валгыды:валгыды N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !"valoisa aika"
вачыгач-гек:вачыгач-гек N_КОЛ_SUB   ; !""
вашт:вашт ADV_КОЛ   ; !"läpi"
видӹмӓш:видӹмӓш N_КОЛ   ; !"vetäminen"
вочыгач% кек:вачыгач-гек N_КОЛ_SUB   ; !""
вуйсӓрӓ:вуйсӓрӓ ADV_ОЛМА   ; !""
выставка:выставка NTag   ; !"näyttely"
вӹлӹ:вӹлӹ N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !"tamma"
декламаци:декламаци NTag   ; !"lausunta"
изверг:изверг N_КОЛ   ; !"hirviö"
иргӓдӹ:иргӓдӹ N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !"kyyhkynen"
йо:йо NTag   ; !"loitsu"
йӓрӓ:йӓрӓ A_ОЛМА   ; !"tyhjä"
канга:канга A_ОЛМА   ; !"laiha"
канымы:канымы N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !"juhla-aatto"
капик:капик N_КОЛ   ; !"kääkkä"
каржикӓ:каржикӓ A_ОЛМА   ; !"kuivunut"
каша:каша A_ОЛМА   ; !"laiha"
колызы:колызы N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !""
компарти:компарти NTag   ; !""
кравать:кравать N_КОЛ   ; !""
кыпышы:кыпышы N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !""
кӹшкӹлтдӹмӓш:кӹшкӹлтдӹмӓш N_КОЛ   ; !""
лапшангы:лапшангы N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !""
льгота:льгота NTag   ; !""
мендузы:мендузы N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !""
мокш:мокш N_КОЛ   ; !"maksa"
накиткӹ:накиткӹ N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !""
немка:немка NTag   ; !""
оптымаш:оптымаш N_КОЛ   ; !"ladonta"
оруйы:оруйы N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !""
перо:перо NTag   ; !""
поспейӹктӹмӓш:поспейӹктӹмӓш N_КОЛ   ; !""
профилактори:профилактори NTag   ; !""
пӓлӹ:пӓлӹ N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !""
рацион:рацион N_КОЛ   ; !""
селитра:селитра NTag   ; !""
сукымаш:сукымаш N_КОЛ   ; !""
тарашкы:тарашкы N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !""
типографи:типографи NTag   ; !""
тышман:тышман N_КОЛ   ; !""
фуфайка:фуфайка NTag   ; !""
цигӓн:цигӓн N_КОЛ   ; !""
шапренгӹ:шапренгӹ N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !""
штат:штат N_КОЛ   ; !""
шӹртӹгӹшкӹ:шӹртӹгӹшкӹ N_ТӸРВӸ   ; !""
эсперанто:эсперанто NTag   ; !""
юбилей:юбилей N_КОЛ   ; !""
LEXICON particles
веле:веле PCLE_   ; !""
вӓк:вӓк PCLE_   ; !""
гӹнят:гӹнят PCLE_   ; !""
дӓ:дӓ PCLE_   ; !""
итӓй:итӓй PCLE_   ; !""
йӓ:йӓ PCLE_   ; !""
каи:каи PCLE_   ; !""
колой:колой PCLE_   ; !""
ма:ма Pcle-Qst   ; !""
нечывы:нечывы PCLE_   ; !""
разве:разве PCLE_   ; !""
тек:тек PCLE_   ; !""
цурат:цурат PCLE_   ; !""
ӓл:ӓл PCLE_   ; !""
ӓлдӓй:ӓлдӓй PCLE_   ; !""
LEXICON postpositions
велӓ:велӓ POSTP_   ; !"vain"
вец:вец POSTP_   ; !"puoleltа; suunnaltа"
вӓреш:вӓреш POSTP_   ; !"asemesta; sijaan; sijasta"
вӹлкӹ:вӹлкӹ POSTP_   ; !"päälle; ylle"
ганьок:ганьок POSTP_   ; !"lailla; tapaan; kuten"
годшен:годшен POSTP_   ; !"alkaen"
докы:докы POSTP_   ; !"luo"
доран:доран POSTP_   ; !"luokse; viereen"
логӹц:логӹц POSTP_   ; !"keskuudesta; seasta; joukosta"
лӹвӓлнӹ:лӹвӓлнӹ POSTP_   ; !""
мычны:мычны POSTP_   ; !""
сылны:сылны POSTP_   ; !""
шайык:шайык POSTP_   ; !""
шотеш:шотеш POSTP_   ; !""
